Nevada, session 83, AB30.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 178.453 is hereby amended to read as follows:
178.453 1. The Administrator or the Administrator’s
designee may request from the Department of Corrections access to
any records in its possession which contain information that may
assist in evaluating and treating a defendant who previously has
served a term of imprisonment under the supervision of the
Department of Corrections and who is committed to the custody of
or ordered to report to the Administrator or the Administrator’s
designee pursuant to NRS 178.425, 178.460, 178.461 or 178.464.
2. Unless otherwise ordered by a court, upon request of the
Administrator or the Administrator’s designee for access to records
of a defendant pursuant to subsection 1, the Department of
Corrections, through the Medical Director, shall provide access to
any such records, including, without limitation, relevant medical and
mental health records, for the limited purpose of allowing the
Administrator or the Administrator’s designee to evaluate and treat
the defendant.
3. The Administrator or the Administrator’s designee may
request from a local detention facility access to any records in its
possession which contain information that may assist in
evaluating and treating a defendant who has previously been
detained or ordered to serve a term of imprisonment in the local
detention facility and who is committed to the custody of or
ordered to report to the Administrator or the Administrator’s
designee pursuant to NRS 178.425, 178.460, 178.461 or 178.464.
4. Unless otherwise ordered by a court, upon request of the
Administrator or the Administrator’s designee for access to
records of a defendant pursuant to subsection 3, a local detention
facility shall provide access to any such records, including,
without limitation, relevant medical and mental health records, for
the limited purpose of allowing the Administrator or the
Administrator’s designee to evaluate and treat the defendant.
5. No oral or written consent of the defendant is required for
the Administrator or the Administrator’s designee to obtain access
to records from the Department of Corrections or a local detention
facility pursuant to this section.
[4.] 6. As used in this section [,] :
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
(a) “Local detention facility” means a county, city or town jail
or detention facility.
(b) “Medical Director” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 209.077.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)